Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.260

Removal of cattle or horses from state—Inspection certificate required.

It is unlawful for any person to remove or cause to be removed or accept for removal from this state, any cattle or horses which are not accompanied at all times by an inspection certificate on such cattle or horses, except as provided by rule adopted under this chapter.

[ 2003 c 326 s 30; 1981 c 296 s 19; 1959 c 54 s 26.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.